Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5197.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Our Massachusetts Judicial and State government officials have severely abused and
violated the Judicial and State government officials immunity privileges which they have abused
the citizen constitutional rights. Their conducts does not only violate clearly established statutory
or constitutional rights of which a reasonable person would have known but they have
dehumanizing and disenfranchised the people of Massachusetts especially the most vulnerable
protective class category.
IMMUNITY DEFENSES DO NOT SHIELD STATE GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS
FROM LIABILITY.
STATE GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS invoke two principal immunity defenses under §
1983: qualified immunity and absolute immunity. Qualified immunity shields government
officials from damages liability so long as their conduct does not violate clearly established
statutory or constitutional rights of which a reasonable person would have known.
of 3

OUR STATE JUDICIAL AND STATE GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS are not entitled to
qualified immunity where they violated due process in judicial proceedings.
Absolute Immunity Does Not Shield Routine Administrative Acts.
Absolute immunity does not apply prosecutors and judges if they are performing core
functions in good faith.
Absolute immunity does not apply to officials performing core functions that have been
historically accorded total immunity—namely judges, prosecutors on quasi-judicial functions,
and legislators on legislative acts if they not are acting in good faith.
The mere fact that they are “appointed executive officials” does not confer blanket
immunity.
State executives are not absolutely immune for Title VII and due process claims. Official
and qualified immunity do not protect officials acting with malice, bad faith, or deliberate
indifference.
“Actual malice” requires “deliberate intention to do wrong” beyond mere ill will; official
immunity lost where malice shown.
Deliberate Indifference Defeats Immunity. While a Judge performing Judicial functions
may enjoy Immunity, denial of constitutional and civil rights are absolutely not a judicial
function and conflicts with any definition of a Judicial function and a state court judge did not
have absolute immunity from damages suit under § 1983.
of 3

A minority of decisions have held that if an inferior judge acts maliciously or corruptly
he/she may incur liability and under the Federal tort law, judges cannot invoke judicial immunity
for acts that violate litigant’s civil rights.
Any state government official or judge who segregated our court houses, practice
unethical corruption, obstruction of justice, bias, prejudice, racism, discrimination, hate crime,
inhumane tortures, abuse, and cruelty and tainted our judicial system should not have absolute
immunity.
State government officials or judges have used absolute immunity to protect themselves
from their negligence and outright wrongdoings to maintain their power base and the people of
Massachusetts seek the abolishment of judicial immunity and State government officials
immunity.
of 3